Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4066.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2025, chapter 34, article 1, section 6, is amended to read: Sec. 6. TRANSFERS. (a) The commissioner of agriculture, in consultation with the commissioner of management and budget, must transfer $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 from the general fund to the agricultural emergency account established under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.041. (b) Of the amount transferred to the agricultural emergency account under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.041, up to $750,000 may be used for the following purposes: (1) to test milk, milk products, poultry products, and pet food before retail sale for the presence of avian influenza; (2) to transfer money to the commissioner of health for biomonitoring for the presence of avian influenza in agricultural workers, farm workers, and poultry or livestock processing employees who volunteer to participate; and (3) to transfer money to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to develop rapid testing, quantification, and human exposure risk assessment models for avian influenza in urban wastewater treatment processes, drinking water treatment processes, and public and private wells. Prior to using or transferring money under this paragraph, the commissioner of agriculture must communicate the intended use and the estimated amount of money to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate committees with jurisdiction over agriculture finance. (c) The commissioner of agriculture, in consultation with the commissioner of management and budget, must transfer $100,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 in fiscal year 2027 from the general fund to the pollinator research account established under Minnesota Statutes, section 18B.051. The commissioner of management and budget must include a transfer of $100,000 each year from the general fund to the pollinator research account established under Minnesota Statutes, section 18B.051, in each forecast prepared under Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.103, from the effective date of this section through the February 2027 forecast. (d) The commissioner of agriculture, in consultation with the commissioner of management and budget, must transfer $186,000 in fiscal year 2026 and deleted text begin $186,000deleted text end new text begin $261,000new text end in fiscal year 2027 from the general fund to the Minnesota grown account under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.102, subdivision 4. The transferred money may be used as grants for Minnesota grown promotion under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.102. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, the appropriations encumbered under contract on or before June 30, 2027, for Minnesota grown grants in this paragraph are available until June 30, 2029. The commissioner of management and budget must include a transfer of deleted text begin $186,000deleted text end new text begin $261,000new text end each year from the general fund to the Minnesota grown account established under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.102, subdivision 4, in each forecast prepared under Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.103, from the effective date of this section through the February 2027 forecast. (e) The commissioner of agriculture, in consultation with the commissioner of management and budget, must transfer $10,677,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $10,677,000 in fiscal year 2027 from the general fund to the agriculture research, education, extension, and technology transfer account under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.14, subdivision 3, for purposes of the agriculture research, education, extension, and technology transfer grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.14. The commissioner of agriculture shall transfer money each year to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for purposes of Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.14, subdivision 1, clauses (1) and (2), and must supplement and not supplant existing sources and levels of funding. The commissioner may use up to one percent of this transfer for costs incurred to administer this program. Of the amount transferred for the agriculture research, education, extension, and technology transfer grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.14: (1) $600,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $600,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for the Minnesota Agricultural Experiment Station's agriculture rapid response fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.14, subdivision 1, clause (2); (2) up to $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and up to $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for research on avian influenza, salmonella, and other turkey related diseases and disease prevention measures; (3) $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for grants to the Minnesota Agricultural Education Leadership Council to enhance agricultural education with priority given to Farm Business Management challenge grants. This allocation is $2,250,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter; (4) $350,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $350,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for potato research; (5) $802,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $802,000 in fiscal year 2027 are to fund the Forever Green Initiative and protect Minnesota's natural resources while increasing the efficiency, profitability, and productivity of Minnesota farmers by incorporating perennial and winter annual crops into existing agricultural practices. By February 1 each year, the dean of the College of Food, Agricultural and Natural Resource Sciences must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture finance and policy and higher education detailing uses of the money in this clause, including administrative costs, and the achievements this money contributed to; (6) $200,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for research on natural stands of wild rice; (7) $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for the cultivated wild rice forward selection project at the North Central Research and Outreach Center, including a tenure track or research associate plant scientist; (8) $290,000 in fiscal year 2026 is for the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for purposes of research on crop contamination and exposure to prions deposited by animals infected with chronic wasting disease. This is a onetime allocation; and (9) $75,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $75,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for grants to the Southwest Minnesota State University Foundation to support the Minnesota Agriculture and Rural Leadership program. This is a onetime allocation. The commissioner of management and budget must include a transfer of $10,352,000 each year from the general fund to the agriculture research, education, extension, and technology transfer account under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.14, subdivision 3, in each forecast prepared under Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.103, from the effective date of this section through the February 2027 forecast. (f) The commissioner of agriculture, in consultation with the commissioner of management and budget, must transfer $1,425,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,425,000 in fiscal year 2027 from the general fund to the agricultural and environmental revolving loan account established under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.117, subdivision 5a, for low-interest or no-interest loans issued through the agriculture best management practices loan program under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.117. The commissioner of management and budget must include a transfer of $1,425,000 each year from the general fund to the agricultural and environmental revolving loan account under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.117, subdivision 5a, in each forecast prepared under Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.103, from the effective date of this section through the February 2027 forecast. (g) The commissioner of agriculture, in consultation with the commissioner of management and budget, must transfer $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 from the grain indemnity account under Minnesota Statutes, section 223.24, subdivision 1, in the agricultural fund to the grain buyers and storage account under Minnesota Statutes, section 232.22, subdivision 3, in the agricultural fund. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end